District of Columbia statutes.
20-351

General.

If the property of a decedent subject to administration in the District of Columbia has a value of $40,000 or less, the property may be administered as a small estate in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(q), 42 DCR 63
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 901, 48 DCR 2087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-351.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-292 substituted “$40,00” for “$15,000”.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.

Section 1102 of D.C. Law 13-292 provided: “Sec. 1102. Applicability. For the purposes of Title 5 and Title 9 and sections 801(b), 805, and 806 of Title 8 of this act, the provisions relating to the administration of decedents’ estates shall apply only to the estates of decedents who die on or after the effective date of this act.”